Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-194]
Kalaeloa community development district; development guidance policies. The following development guidance policies
shall generally govern the authority's actions in the Kalaeloa community
development district:

(1) Development
shall be in accordance with the community reuse plan, except as it conflicts
with the Hawaii state constitution and the Hawaii Revised Statutes, as they
relate to the department of Hawaiian home lands;

(2) With the
approval of the governor and concurrence of the Navy, and in accordance with
state law governing lands owned by the department of Hawaiian home lands, the
authority, upon the concurrence of a majority of its voting members, may modify
and make changes to the reuse plan to respond to changing conditions; provided
that prior to amending the reuse plan the authority shall conduct a public
hearing to inform the public of the proposed changes and receive public input;

(3) Development
shall seek to promote economic development and employment opportunities by
fostering diverse land uses and encouraging private sector investments that
utilize the opportunities presented by the receipt of property from the base
closure consistent with the needs of the public;

(4) The authority may engage in planning, design, and
construction activities within and outside of the district; provided that
activities outside of the district shall relate to infrastructure development,
area-wide drainage improvements, roadways realignments and improvements,
business and industrial relocation, and other activities the authority deems
necessary to carry out redevelopment of the district and implement this
chapter. Studies or coordinating activities may be undertaken by the authority
in conjunction with the county and appropriate state agencies and may address
facility systems, industrial relocation, and other activities;

(5) Planning,
replanning, rehabilitation, development, redevelopment, and other preparation
for reuse of Barbers Point Naval Air Station under this chapter are public uses
and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired;

(6) Hawaiian
archaeological, historic, and cultural sites shall be preserved and protected.
Endangered species of flora and fauna and significant military facilities shall
be preserved to the extent feasible;

(7) Land use and
redevelopment activities within the district shall be coordinated with and to
the extent possible complement existing county and state policies, plans, and
programs affecting the district; and

(8) Public facilities
within the district shall be planned, located, and developed to support the
redevelopment policies established by this chapter for the district, the reuse
plan approved by the governor, and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. [L
2002, c 184, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next